Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 10
G

EORGIA MUSIC HALL OF FAME AUTHORITY

Cross references.

- Department of Community Affairs, T. 50, C. 8.

Law reviews.

-
For article, "Intellectual Property Checklist for Marketing the Recording Artist Online," see 18 J. Intell. Prop. L. 541 (2011). For article, "Clearing the Way: Acquiring Rights and Approvals for Music Use in Media Applications," see 18 J. Intell. Prop. L. 561 (2011).

12-3-520. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Music Hall of Fame Authority Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-3-520

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1062, § 1.)

12-3-521. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Authority" means the Georgia Music Hall of Fame Authority.

"Cost of the project" means the cost of construction; the cost of all lands, properties, rights, easements, and franchises acquired; the cost of all machinery and equipment; financing charges; interest prior to and during construction and for one year after completion of construction; the cost of engineering, architectural, and legal expenses and of plans and specifications and other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the project; administrative expenses; and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the financing authorized in this part, the construction of any project, the placing of the same in operation, and the condemnation of property necessary for such construction and operation. Any obligation or expense incurred for any of the foregoing purposes shall be regarded as a part of the cost of the project and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of such bonds or obligations as may be issued by any authority, department, commission, or agency of the State of Georgia.

"Project" means and includes one or a combination of two or more of the following: buildings, facilities, and all structures; electric, gas, steam, water, and sewerage utilities; and improvements of every kind and character deemed by the authority necessary or convenient for its purposes.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-521

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1062, § 1.)

12-3-522. Creation; membership; meetings; expense allowance; perpetual existence; records.

There is created a body corporate and politic to be known as the Georgia Music Hall of Fame Authority which shall be deemed to be an instrumentality of the State of Georgia and a public corporation; and by that name, style, and title such body may contract and be contracted with, bring and defend actions, implead and be impleaded, and complain and defend in all courts of this state.

The authority shall consist of nine members. Initially, members shall serve staggered terms of office as follows: two members for one year, two members for two years, two members for three years, and three members for four years. Thereafter, each member shall serve for a term of four years. All members shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate and shall serve until the appointment and qualification of their successors. The members appointed by the Governor shall be selected from the state at large but shall be representative of all of the geographic areas of the state. Such members also shall represent the state's music industry. The Governor is authorized to appoint any elected or appointed state, county, municipal, or school board official or employee, except officials and employees of the legislative or judicial branches of state government, as members of the authority, and any person so appointed is authorized to serve as a member of the authority. All successors shall be appointed in the same manner as original appointments. Vacancies in office shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments. An appointment to fill a vacancy shall be for the unexpired term.

The authority shall hold a meeting each year in July, and, at each July meeting, the authority shall elect its own officers. Officers shall serve for terms of one year each beginning with their election and qualification and ending with the election and qualification of their respective successors. No person shall hold the same office for more than one consecutive term, and no member of the authority shall hold more than any one office of the authority. No vacancy on the authority shall impair the right of the quorum to exercise all rights and perform all duties of the authority.

The authority is assigned to the Department of Economic Development for administrative purposes only, as specified in Code Section 50-4-3.

Each member of the authority who is not otherwise a state officer or employee shall receive for each day that such member is in attendance at a meeting of the authority a daily expense allowance and reimbursement for transportation costs as provided for in Code Section 45-7-21. Each member of the authority who is otherwise an officer or employee of a state agency or authority may be reimbursed by that agency or authority for meals, transportation, and lodging in the usual manner authorized by law for such officers and employees. The members of the authority shall not receive any duplicate or other compensation for their services as such.

The authority shall have perpetual existence. Any change in name or composition of the authority shall in no way affect the vested rights of any person under this part or impair the obligations of any contracts existing under this part.

The members of the authority shall be accountable in all respects as trustees. The authority shall keep suitable and proper books and records of all receipts, income, and expenditures of every kind and shall submit for inspection all the books, together with the proper statement of the authority's financial position, to the state auditor.

Except for the authorization of the issuance of bonds, the authority may delegate to the executive director such powers and duties as it may deem proper.

The commissioner of economic development shall be the executive director of the authority. The executive director shall appoint such directors, deputies, assistants, and other staff members as may be necessary to manage the operations of the authority and may organize the authority into such divisions, sections, or offices as may be deemed necessary or convenient.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-522

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1062, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 809, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1386, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 306, §§ 8, 9/SB 125.)

12-3-522.1. Joint operation between Georgia Music Hall of Fame and Georgia Sports Hall of Fame; proposals for accomplishing objectives.

The Georgia Music Hall of Fame Authority and the Georgia Sports Hall of Fame Authority shall to the maximum extent possible work jointly to realize efficiencies and economies in the operation of their adjacent facilities. The two authorities shall make all possible efforts to consolidate and coordinate marketing, operational, maintenance, property management, and other activities so as to achieve such efficiencies and economies. Not later than September 30, 2010, each such hall of fame authority shall issue a request for proposals for a new location or alternative ownership, management, and operation at the same location for the respective hall of fame facility. Such requests for proposals shall be disseminated to each county and municipal governing authority in the state and shall require that any proposal be submitted not later than December 31, 2010. Any county or municipality wherein such a hall of fame authority is located shall be eligible to submit a proposal; and it is the intention of the General Assembly that such a proposal shall be required as a condition for continued state funding support in a current location. Upon receipt of one or more proposals, the hall of fame authority shall conduct a staff review of each proposal received. A primary consideration in the review of the proposals shall be the effect of each proposal on the current and future operating budgets of the authority and self-sustainability of the authority, including a determination of whether cost savings and operational efficiencies can be effected through moving to a new location or alternative ownership, management, and operation at the same location as proposed. Upon completion of the staff review, the findings shall be submitted to the governing body of the hall of fame authority. Each hall of fame authority shall not later than April 30, 2011, submit to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the chairpersons of the Senate and House appropriations committees a report detailing the activities of the authority with respect to issuance of the request for proposals, receipt and evaluation of proposals, and the decision of the authority with respect to acceptance of proposals.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-522.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 331, § 2/SB 523; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 12/HB 142.)

12-3-523. Corporate purpose and general nature of business.

The corporate purpose and general nature of the business of the authority shall be:

Constructing and maintaining a facility to house the Georgia Music Hall of Fame;

Operating, advertising, and promoting the Georgia Music Hall of Fame; and

Promoting music events at the facility and throughout the state.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-523

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1062, § 1.)

12-3-524. General powers.

The authority is authorized:

To have a seal and alter it at pleasure;

To acquire, hold, and dispose of personal property for its corporate purposes;

To appoint, select, and employ officers, agents, and employees, including engineering, architectural, and construction experts and fiscal agents; to contract for the services of individuals or organizations not employed full time by the authority who or which are engaged primarily in the rendition of personal services rather than the sale of goods or merchandise, such as, but not limited to, the services of accountants, engineers, architects, consultants, and advisers, and to allow suitable compensation for such services; including the power to contract with the Department of Economic Development or any other department for professional, technical, clerical, and administrative support as may be required and to make provisions for group insurance, retirement, or other employee benefit arrangements, provided that no part-time or contract employees shall participate in group insurance or retirement benefits;

To make contracts and to execute all instruments necessary or convenient, including contracts for construction of projects or contracts with respect to the leasing or use of projects which the authority causes to be subdivided, erected, or acquired;

To plan, survey, subdivide, administer, construct, erect, acquire, own, repair, remodel, maintain, add to, extend, improve, equip, operate, and manage projects as defined in this part, such projects to be located on property owned or leased by the authority or the State of Georgia or under the control and management of the authority. The cost of any such project shall be paid from its income, from the proceeds of revenue anticipation certificates of the authority, or from such proceeds and any loan, gift, or grant from the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or the State of Georgia, or any county, municipal corporation, authority, or local government or governing body;

To accept loans or grants, or both, of money, materials, or property of any kind from the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof upon such terms and conditions as the United States of America or such agency or instrumentality may impose;

To borrow money for any of its corporate purposes, to issue negotiable revenue anticipation certificates from earnings of such projects, and to provide for the payment of the same and for the rights of the holders thereof;

To exercise any power which is usually possessed by private corporations performing similar functions and which is not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of this state;

To act as agent for the United States of America or any agency, department, corporation, or instrumentality thereof in any manner within the purposes or powers of the authority;

To adopt, alter, or repeal its own bylaws, rules, and regulations governing the manner in which its business may be transacted and in which the power granted to it may be enjoyed as the authority may deem necessary or expedient in facilitating its business;

To receive and accept loans, gifts, grants, donations, or contributions of property, facilities, or services, with or without consideration, from any person, firm, or corporation or from the State of Georgia or any agency or instrumentality thereof or from any county, municipal corporation, or local government or governing body;

To hold, use, administer, and expend such sum or sums as may hereafter be received as income, as gifts, or as appropriations by authority of the General Assembly for any of the purposes of this authority;

To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers and purposes of the authority;

To acquire, lease (as lessee), purchase, hold, own, and use any franchise or any property, real or personal, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein; and to sell, lease (as lessor), transfer, or dispose thereof whenever the same is no longer required for purposes of the authority or exchange the same for other property or rights which are useful for the purposes of the authority;

To fix, alter, charge, and collect fares, rates, rentals, and other charges for its facilities and for admission to its grounds at reasonable rates to be determined by the authority;

To contract with the Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission for the construction of the project as provided for in Article 2 of Chapter 17 of Title 50; or to contract with other authorities, departments, or agencies of the State of Georgia for the construction of the project;

To invest and reinvest any or all idle funds or moneys, including, but not limited to, funds held in reserve or debt retirement or received through the issuance of revenue certificates or from contributions, gifts, or grants, which cannot be immediately used for the purpose for which received, such investment to be made in any security or securities which are legal investments for executors or trustees; provided, however, that investments in such securities will at all times be held for and, when sold, used for the purposes for which the money was originally received;

To grant, on an exclusive or nonexclusive basis, the right to use and occupy streets, roads, sidewalks, and other public places for the purpose of rendering utility services, upon such conditions and for such time as the authority may deem wise;

To appoint special advisory committees and panels of citizens to advise the authority of certain issues and to reimburse the individuals appointed for actual expenses incurred in performing their tasks;

To select a site for the building of a state music hall of fame;

To sell, upon obtaining a license from the Department of Revenue, alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises only upon property operated and controlled by the authority;

To incorporate one or more nonprofit corporations as subsidiary corporations of the authority for the purpose of carrying out any of the powers of the authority and to accomplish any of the purposes of the authority. Any subsidiary corporations created pursuant to this power shall be created pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 14, the "Georgia Nonprofit Corporation Code," and the Secretary of State shall be authorized to accept such filings. Upon dissolution of any subsidiary corporation of the authority, any assets shall revert to the authority or to any successor to the authority or, failing such succession, to the State of Georgia. The authority shall not be liable for the debts or obligations or bonds of any subsidiary corporation or for the actions or omissions to act of any subsidiary corporation unless the authority expressly so consents; and

The authority shall have the power to contract with the Department of Economic Development or any other department for any purpose necessary or incidental to carrying out or performing the duties, responsibilities, or functions of the authority in exercising the power and management of the authority; provided, however, that such contracts shall not delegate the authorization of the issuance of any bonds or other indebtedness of the authority. No part of the funds or assets of the authority shall be distributed to the Department of Economic Development or any other department, authority, or agency of the state unless otherwise provided by law, except that the authority shall be authorized and empowered to pay reasonable compensation for services rendered and to reimburse expenses incurred and except as may be deemed necessary or desirable by the authority to fulfill the purposes of the authority as set forth in this part. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed as precluding the provision, by the Department of Economic Development, any other department, authority, or agency of the state, or the authority, of joint or complementary services or programs within the scope of their respective powers.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-524

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1062, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 493, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1386, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 306, §§ 10, 11/SB 125.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, "advisers" was substituted for "advisors" following "consultants, and" near the middle of paragraph (3).

12-3-524.1. Expenditure of funds to aid in securing gifts, grants, donations, and contributions.

The authority, in order to make the Georgia Music Hall of Fame competitive with other nonprofit cultural institutions in securing gifts, grants, donations, and contributions and in the promotion and marketing of the Georgia Music Hall of Fame, is authorized to expend available funds for the meals, entertainment, and incidental expenses of bona fide prospects, contributors, and other persons who attend any function at the request of the authority or its staff to discuss the securing of, to provide services in the securing of, or to make gifts, grants, donations, and contributions to the Georgia Music Hall of Fame or to promote and market Georgia Music Hall of Fame programs and facilities. All such expenditures shall be verified by vouchers showing the date, place, purpose, and persons for whom such expenditures were made. The authority shall make available to the state auditor such vouchers or other collateral materials requested for the purposes of conducting an audit of the authority's books, accounts, and records as required by state law.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-524.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 1084, § 1.)

12-3-525. Exemption from taxation.

It is found, determined, and declared that the creation of the authority and the carrying out of its corporate purposes are in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state and constitute a public purpose and that the authority will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the powers conferred upon it by this part. The State of Georgia covenants that the authority shall be required to pay no taxes or assessments upon any of the property acquired by it or under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision or upon its activities in the operation or maintenance of the facilities erected, maintained, or acquired by it or any fees, rentals, or other charges for the use of such facilities or other income received by the authority; provided, however, in no event shall the exemptions granted in this Code section extend to any lessee or other private person or entity.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-525

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1062, § 1.)

12-3-526. Police powers.

The authority is authorized to exercise such of the police powers of the state as may be necessary to maintain peace and order and to enforce any and all zoning, use, and personal conduct restrictions upon the properties, facilities, and persons under its jurisdiction to the extent that such is lawful under the laws of the United States and this state. The authority may delegate all or any part of the performance of these functions temporarily or permanently to the state or to the county in which its facilities are located.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-526

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1062, § 1.)

12-3-527. Security force.

The authority is authorized to contract for or to provide for and maintain a security force with respect to the facilities and property owned, leased, operated, or under the control of the authority and within the territory thereof.
The security force shall have the duty to protect persons and property, disperse unlawful or dangerous assemblages, control pedestrian and vehicular traffic, and otherwise preserve and protect the public peace, health, and safety.
For these purposes, a member of such force shall be a peace officer and, as such, shall have authority equivalent to the authority of a policeman or law enforcement officer of the county in which he is discharging his duties.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-527

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1062, § 1.)

12-3-528. Moneys received by authority deemed to be trust funds.

All moneys received pursuant to the authority of this part, whether as grants or other contributions or as revenues, rents, and earnings, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this part.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-528

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1062, § 1.)

12-3-529. Authority to fix rentals and other charges for users and exhibitors.

The authority is authorized to fix rentals and other charges which any user, exhibitor, concessionaire, franchisee, or vendor shall pay to the authority for the use of the project or part thereof or combination thereof, and to charge and collect the same, and to lease and make contracts with political subdivisions and agencies with respect to use of any part of the project.
The rentals and other charges shall be so fixed and adjusted in respect to the aggregate thereof from the project or any part thereof so as to provide a fund sufficient with other revenues of such project, if any, to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating the project, including the reserves for extraordinary repairs and insurance, unless such cost shall be otherwise provided for, which cost shall be deemed to include the expenses incurred by the authority on account of the project for water, light, sewer, and other services furnished by other facilities at the project.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-529

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1062, § 1.)

12-3-530. Attorney General to provide legal services for authority.

The Attorney General shall provide legal services for the authority and in connection therewith the provisions of Code Sections 45-15-13 through 45-15-16 shall be fully applicable.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-530

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1062, § 1.)

12-3-531. Jurisdiction of actions brought under this part.

Any action to protect or enforce any rights under this part shall be brought in the Superior Court of Fulton County, Georgia; and such court shall have exclusive, original jurisdiction of such actions. Nothing contained in this part shall be construed to impair any rights afforded the state under the Constitution of the United States.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-531

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1062, § 1.)

12-3-532. Contracts or transactions of authority involving conflict of interest.

Every member of the authority and every employee of the authority who knowingly has any interest, direct or indirect, in any contract to which the authority is or is about to become a party, or in any other business of the authority, or in any firm or corporation doing business with the authority shall make full disclosure of such interest to the authority. Failure to disclose such an interest shall constitute cause for which a member of the authority may be removed or an employee discharged or otherwise disciplined at the discretion of the authority.

The provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 10 of Title 16 and Code Sections 16-10-21, 16-10-22, 16-10-92, and 16-10-93, regulating the conduct of officers, employees, and agents of political subdivisions, municipal and other public corporations, and other public organizations, shall be applicable to the conduct of members, officers, employees, and agents of the authority.

Any contract or transaction of the authority involving a conflict of interest which is not disclosed under subsection (a) of this Code section, or involving a violation of Article 1 of Chapter 10 of Title 16 or Code Section

16-10-21

,

16-10-22

,

16-10-92

, or

16-10-93

, or involving a violation of any other provision of law regulating conflicts of interest which is applicable to the authority or its members, officers, or employees shall be voidable by the authority.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-532

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1062, § 1.)